Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 8
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
FOR CHILDREN WITH AUTISM

25.5-6-801. Short title.

This part 8 shall be known and may be cited as the "Home- and Community-based Services for Children with Autism Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1958, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-691 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-802. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible child" means a child who:

Is eligible for the state's medicaid program pursuant to section 25.5-5-101, 25.5-5-201, or 25.5-5-203;

Is age birth to eight years; except that, so long as a child begins receiving services prior to his or her eighth birthday, the child is entitled to continue receiving services for a total of three full years;

Has a diagnosis of autism;

Is at risk of institutionalization in either an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, a hospital, or a nursing facility; and

Is not receiving services from any of the alternatives to long-term care waiver programs established in this title.

"Lead provider" means the credentialed, certified, or licensed professional who is the eligible child's primary provider and who is responsible for supervision of the eligible child's care plan.

"Services" means the home- and community-based services provided pursuant to this part 8.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1958, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2295, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 15-1186), ch. 234, p. 867, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-692 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 8, see § 25.5-4-103.

25.5-6-803. Federal authorization - budget neutrality.

The state department shall seek the federal authorization necessary to implement the provisions of this part 8.

Home- and community-based services for children with autism shall meet aggregate federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.

Repealed.

The provision of home- and community-based services pursuant to this part 8 shall be subject to the availability of federal matching medicaid funds, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, for payment of the costs for administration and the costs for the provision of such services.

The state department shall:

Seek and utilize any available federal, state, or private funds which are available for carrying out the purposes of this part 8, including but not limited to medicaid funds pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended;

Provide a system of reimbursement for services that encourages the most cost-effective provision of services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1958, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(3)(a) repealed, (HB 15-1186), ch. 234, p. 867, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-693 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-804. Services - duties of the state department - rules.

Subject to the provisions of this part 8, home- and community-based services for children with autism shall include only the following services, as specified in the eligible child's care plan:

Occupational therapy;

Speech therapy;

Psychological and psychiatric services;

Physical therapy;

Behavioral therapy; and

Services provided under the consumer-directed care service model, part 11 of this article.

Within the limits of the general assembly's annual appropriations, the medical services board shall set an annual dollar limit on the amount of services that an eligible child may receive pursuant to this part 8.

The state department shall utilize the services of existing service provider agencies to provide services pursuant to this part 8. A service provider agency shall retain no more than fifteen percent of the established service reimbursement rate for administrative costs.

A care planning agency may be certified to provide the services described in subsection (1) of this section if otherwise qualified as a provider under the state medical assistance program.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department shall contract with a community centered board for persons with developmental disabilities to serve as the single entry point agency for services and as the care planning agency for eligible children. If a community centered board is unwilling or unable to enter into the contract with the state department, the state department may contract with a single entry point agency identified pursuant to section 25.5-6-106 or a state-department-approved case management agency to serve as the entry point agency and as the care planning agency. The care planning process shall include the eligible child's family or guardian, the eligible child's lead provider, and the eligible child's case manager. For the purpose of implementing this part 8 the care planning process shall be coordinated with any other care plan or case manager the eligible child may have.

(5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department shall contract with a case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities to serve as the agency for services and as the care planning agency for eligible children. The care planning process shall include the eligible child's family or guardian, the eligible child's lead provider, and the eligible child's case manager. For the purpose of implementing this part 8, the care planning process shall be coordinated with any other care plan or case manager the eligible child may have.

A member of an eligible child's family may be employed to provide services to the child. The reimbursement limitation in section 25.5-6-310 shall not apply to services provided pursuant to this part 8 by a family member.

The state department shall develop the service provisions, which shall include provisions for the supervision of direct care providers, and the care planning process under this part 8 in consultation with parents of children with autism and medical professionals who have expertise in treating children with autism.

The state board shall adopt rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this part 8, including but not limited to requiring an ongoing evaluation process for each eligible child and the use of an external evaluation contractor for this purpose.

An eligible child participating in services pursuant to this part 8 shall be evaluated at entry into the program, at least every six months during the course of services, and at the termination of services pursuant to this part 8. The evaluations shall include, but need not be limited to:

An assessment of the eligible child's expressive and receptive communication through the use of a standardized and norm-referenced assessment as determined by the state department through rule;

An assessment of the eligible child's adaptive skills including self-help skills through the use of a norm-referenced and standardized assessment as determined by the state department through rule; and

An assessment of the severity of the eligible child's maladaptive behavior, including self-injurious or aggressive behaviors or tantrums, through the use of a norm-referenced and standardized assessment as determined by the state department through rule.

The evaluations shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (8) by the child's lead therapist or other trained professionals as designated by the department.

The evaluator shall provide a copy of the evaluation, including any supporting data, to the eligible child's parent or legal guardian and to the agency responsible for the eligible child's care planning. The agency responsible for the eligible child's care planning shall retain a copy of the eligible child's evaluation and supporting data.

Any costs associated with the evaluations required pursuant to this subsection (8) shall be included within the annual cost limitation on services set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Evaluations of an eligible child may be conducted through the eligible child's school or with other resources that are not part of the services provided pursuant to this part 8, so long as the evaluations are consistent with the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (8).

The ongoing evaluation of children receiving services under the program pursuant to this subsection (8) shall not be used to alter a child's eligibility to participate in the program.

Repealed.

Subject to available appropriations, it is the intent of the general assembly to provide services to every eligible child who applies for the waiver program and that no eligible child is placed on a waiting list for services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1959, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (SB 10-129), ch. 105, p. 354, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2012:

(8) amended and (9) and (10) added, (SB 12-159), ch. 203, p. 808, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) and (10) amended and (9) repealed, (HB 15-1186), ch. 234, p. 867, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 336, § 35, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-694 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (8) and adding subsections (9) and (10), see section 1 of chapter 203, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

25.5-6-805. Colorado autism treatment fund.

The Colorado autism treatment fund is hereby created and established in the state treasury for the purpose of paying for services provided to eligible children, early and periodic screening diagnosis and treatment services required by section 25.5-5-102 (1)(g), and participant and program evaluations pursuant to this part 8. The fund is comprised of tobacco settlement moneys allocated to the fund. Moneys in the fund are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purposes of this part 8. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this part 8 may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Pursuant to section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(k), C.R.S., for the 2016-17 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter so long as the state receives moneys pursuant to the master settlement agreement, the state treasurer shall annually transfer to the fund two percent of the moneys received by the state pursuant to the master settlement agreement for the preceding fiscal year. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount specified in this subsection (2) from moneys credited to the tobacco litigation settlement cash fund created in section 24-22-115, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1960, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-210), ch. 124, p. 531, § 4, effective April 16.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-159), ch. 203, p. 809, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 468, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-695 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 203, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

25.5-6-806. Autism waiver - program evaluation.

As provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state department shall submit written program evaluations to the health and environment committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, and to the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committee, concerning home- and community-based services provided to children with autism pursuant to this part 8. The state department shall determine the appropriate process and procedures for conducting the evaluation, including procedures to protect a program participant's individually identifying information.

On or before June 1, 2013, the state department's evaluation shall include, at a minimum, information concerning:

The number of eligible children receiving services or who have received services under the waiver program;

The average and median age of eligible children when they begin receiving services and the average length of time that children receive services; and

The average cost of services provided to an eligible child.

On or before June 1, 2014, the state department's evaluation shall include, at a minimum, information concerning the design and implementation of the ongoing evaluation process pursuant to section 25.5-6-804 (8).

On or before June 1, 2015, and every June 1 thereafter, the state department's evaluation shall include an evaluation of eligible children's care plans and evaluations conducted at the beginning and ending of services, as well as ongoing evaluations during the course of services, to determine whether home- and community-based services provided pursuant to this part 8 are effective in meeting the goals of the waiver program, which goals include, but are not limited to:

Serving the children most vulnerable to institutionalization without the services provided pursuant to this part 8;

Keeping children out of institutions; and

Demonstrating improvement in the child's expressive and receptive communication, adaptive skills, such as dressing and toileting, and a reduction in the severity of the child's maladaptive behavior, including self-injurious or aggressive behavior and tantrums, through the use of standardized and norm-referenced assessments.

The state department may contract with an independent program evaluator with expertise in reviewing treatment progress reports, individual evaluations, and medical records for purposes of conducting the evaluation pursuant to this paragraph (c) concerning the effectiveness of the home- and community-based services provided pursuant to this part 8.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-159), ch. 203, p. 809, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

IP(2)(c)(I) amended, (HB 15-1186), ch. 234, p. 868, § 5, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 203, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.